Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.92.115

Increase in number of elected county commissioners—Remedy for vote dilution concerning Indian tribal status.

(1) A county may reasonably increase the number of elected commissioners to remedy a potential violation of RCW 29A.92.020 if the protected class or one of the protected classes subject to alleged vote dilution is Indian tribal status.

(2) After finding a violation of RCW 29A.92.020 or upon stipulation of the parties, the court may order a reasonable increase in the number of elected officials on a county commission if the defendant political subdivision is a county and the protected class or one of the protected classes subject to alleged vote dilution is Indian tribal status.

[ 2023 c 56 s 12.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 56: See note following RCW 29A.92.720.